Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1814
Demurrer or reply to plea in abatement; when made.

To any plea in abatement the county attorney may demur if it is not sufficient in substance, or he may reply setting forth any facts which may show that there is no defect in the record as charged in the plea.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 446, p. 822;

R.S.1913, § 9090;

C.S.1922, § 10115;

C.S.1929, § 29-1813;

R.S.1943, § 29-1814.

Joinder of issues on plea in abatement may be waived. Svehla v. State, 168 Neb. 553, 96 N.W.2d 649 (1959).

Demurrer to plea in bar admits all facts well pleaded therein. Smith v. State, 42 Neb. 356, 60 N.W. 585 (1894).